Idaho, session 2025, H0432.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-1085, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-1085. AGREEMENTS ENTERED INTO BY STATE OFFICERS OR STATE AGENCIES
-- REPORTING. (1) All state officers and departments, divisions, bureaus,
and agencies of the state of Idaho shall report to the state controller any
agreement entered into, including any memorandum of agreement or memorandum
of understanding, within ten (10) days of the state officer or department,
division, bureau, or agency entering into such agreement. The state con-
troller shall store, maintain, and publish a current list of all such agree-
ments, as provided in section 67-1001(20), Idaho Code.
(2) Any state officer or department, division, bureau, or agency re-
porting an agreement pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall also
provide a contact person for the agreement.
(3) The state controller shall have authority to develop a policy in or-
der to carry out the provisions and requirements of this section, including
the scope and method of reporting agreements, and shall publish and maintain
such policy in the same location where the list of agreements is published.
The stated intent of the policy shall be to further improve transparency of
state agreements.
(4) Any state officer or department, division, bureau, or agency that
knowingly fails to report any agreement entered into, including any memo-
randum of agreement or memorandum of understanding, pursuant to this section
may be subject to liability as provided in chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.